Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2055.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 25-101b is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
101b. At the general election held in 1978 and each four (4) years
thereafter, there shall be elected a treasurer for the state of Kansas, whose
term of office shall be four (4) years beginning on the second Monday in
January next succeeding such treasurer's election. In case of a vacancy in
such office, the governor shall appoint some a suitable person who shall
be registered with the same political party as that of the state treasurer
elected at the immediately preceding election for such office, to serve for
the unexpired term and until a successor is elected and qualified. If the
state treasurer elected at the immediately preceding election for such
office was not registered with any political party, then the governor shall
appoint a suitable person to serve for the unexpired term and until a
successor is elected and qualified. Appointments by the governor under
this section shall be subject to confirmation by the senate as provided in
K.S.A. 75-4315b, and amendments thereto. Except as provided by K.S.A.
46-2601, and amendments thereto, no person appointed to the office of
state treasurer shall exercise any power, duty or function as state treasurer
until confirmed by the senate.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 40-106 is hereby amended to read as follows: 40-106.
At the general election held in 1978 and each four (4) years thereafter,
there shall be elected a commissioner of insurance for the state of Kansas,
whose term of office shall be four (4) years beginning on the second
Monday in January next succeeding such commissioner's election. In case
of a vacancy in such office the governor shall appoint some a suitable
person who shall be registered with the same political party as that of the
commissioner of insurance elected at the immediately preceding election
for such office, to serve for the unexpired term and until a successor is

HB 2055 2
elected and qualified. If the commissioner of insurance elected at the
immediately preceding election for such office was not registered with any
political party, then the governor shall appoint a suitable person to serve
for the unexpired term and until a successor is elected and qualified.
Appointments by the governor under this section shall be subject to
confirmation by the senate as provided in K.S.A. 75-4315b, and
amendments thereto. Except as provided by K.S.A. 46-2601, and
amendments thereto, no person appointed to the office of commissioner of
insurance shall exercise any power, duty or function as commissioner of
insurance until confirmed by the senate.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 25-101b and 40-106 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.